Vermont, session 2025-2026, S207.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 118 is added to read:
CHAPTER 118. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
Subchapter 1. Surveillance Pricing
§ 4193a. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Aggregate consumer information” means information that relates to
a group or category of consumers, from which individual consumer identities
have been removed, that is not linked or reasonably linkable to any consumer
or household, including through the use of a device.
VT LEG #384891 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.207
2026 Page 2 of 4
(2) “Consumer” means a person who purchases or intends to purchase a
consumer product.
(3) “Consumer commodity” has the same meaning as in 6 V.S.A. § 681.
(4) “Consumer product” means any product that is regularly used or
purchased to be used for personal, family, household, commercial, or business
purposes, including a consumer commodity.
(5) “Covered information” means either personally identifiable
information or aggregate consumer information.
(6) “Electronic surveillance technology” means a system, software, or
process derived from machine learning, statistics, or other data processing or
artificial intelligence techniques used to collect, capture, record, or retain
personally identifiable information.
(7) “Personally identifiable information” has the same meaning as in
subdivision 2430(10) of this title.
(8) “Standard price” means the price of a good or service that is set for
all consumers that is not based upon covered information.
(9) “Surveillance pricing” means using covered information gathered
through electronic surveillance technology to set the price of a consumer
product that differs from the standard price.
VT LEG #384891 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.207
2026 Page 3 of 4
§ 4193b. SURVEILLANCE PRICING; PROHIBITION
(a) Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, a person shall
not use surveillance pricing to distribute, sell, or offer for sale a consumer
product in the State.
(b) A person may use surveillance pricing to distribute, sell, or offer for
sale a consumer product if any of the following apply:
(1) The difference from the standard price charged to a consumer is
based solely on the cost to the person of providing the consumer product to
that consumer.
(2) The difference from the standard price is a discount offered to all
consumers on equal terms in a manner consistent with applicable
antidiscrimination laws. If the person gathers personally identifiable
information in connection with the provision of this discount, the person shall
ensure both of the following:
(A) the consumer shall receive a clear and conspicuous written notice
describing in readily ascertainable terms the specific intended purposes for
which the person will use the personally identifiable information before the
person uses the information for those purposes; and
(B) the consumer shall provide written affirmative consent for any
purpose described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) before the
consumer’s personally identifiable information is used for that purpose.
VT LEG #384891 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.207
2026 Page 4 of 4
(3) The person is licensed by the Department of Financial Regulation to
conduct insurance business in the State pursuant to 8 V.S.A. chapter 101,
provided that the person complies with any applicable rate standards under 8
V.S.A. chapter 128.
§ 4193c. VIOLATIONS
(a) A violation of this subchapter is deemed to be a violation of section
2453 of this title.
(b) The Attorney General has the same authority to make rules, conduct
civil investigations, and bring civil actions with respect to the acts and
practices that constitute surveillance pricing as is provided under chapter 63,
subchapter 1 of this title.
(c) A consumer subject to surveillance pricing has the same rights as a
consumer has under section 2461 of this title.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #384891 v.1